Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7898.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-21 of the General Laws entitled "Health And Safety of Pupils" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-21-44. Weapon detection systems in schools.
(a) Definitions. For purposes of this section:
(1) “Public entrance” means the main entrance to any school building, gymnasium, school
event facility, sporting event site and any site where a school hosts or participates in an event even
if off campus.
(2) “School” means any private or public institution of elementary or secondary (K-12
grade) education, accredited or recognized as a private or public school by the state department of
education, to include every charter school, independent school and mayoral academy as defined in
chapters 77.1 through 77.4 of title 16.
(3) “Weapon detection system” means a walk-through security technology or integrated
set of devices designated to detect, through electronic, visual or analytical means the presence of
weapons including, but not limited to, firearms and hazardous objects. Such system shall be capable
of detecting the presence of weapons irrespective of whether such weapons are carried by or
otherwise in the possession or control of an individual.
(b) Commencing January 1, 2027, every school, all school facilities and buildings, as well
as sponsored or associated school events, and school-involved sporting and athletic field events
and auditoriums shall have installed weapons detection systems at every public entrance. All public

entrances that do not have a weapons detection system installed shall be locked and/or equipped
with alarms in order to prevent entry from the outside, but shall remain operable from the inside to
comply with the fire safety code.
(c) In consultation and cooperation with the office of the attorney general, state law
enforcement and the Rhode Island department of education, shall provide training in the use and
maintenance of all weapon detection systems to school officials who shall use the equipment and
protocol for responding when contraband is detected.
(d) The Rhode Island department of education, shall promulgate rules and regulations to
implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005774
========
LC005774 - Page 2 of 3